Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.410

Director's duty to enforce—Adoption of rules.

The director shall enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter and may adopt the necessary rules to carry out its purposes. The adoption of rules shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW (administrative procedure act), as enacted or hereafter amended, concerning the adoption of rules.

[ 2017 c 158 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 12.]